Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1074.
do enact as follows:SB1074,11Section 1. 20.835 (2) (cd) of the statutes is created to read:SB1074,2,3220.835 (2) (cd) Additional child and dependent care tax credit. A sum 3sufficient to make the payments under s. 71.07 (9g) (d) 2.SB1074,24Section 2. 71.07 (9g) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1074,2,12571.07 (9g) (b) 2. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, and 6before January 1, 2026, and subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a 7claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the 8amount of those taxes, an amount equal to 100 percent of the federal child and 9dependent care tax credit that the claimant may claim on his or her federal income 10tax return for the taxable year to which the claim under this subsection relates 11using the expense limitation under par. (c) 5. rather than the expense limitation 12under 26 USC 21 (c).SB1074,313Section 3. 71.07 (9g) (b) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB1074,2,201471.07 (9g) (b) 3. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and 15subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 16credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 an amount equal to 100 percent of the 17federal child and dependent care tax credit that the claimant may claim on his or 18her federal income tax return for the taxable year to which the claim under this 19subsection relates using the expense limitation under par. (c) 5. rather than the 20expense limitation under 26 USC 21 (c).SB1074,421Section 4. 71.07 (9g) (d) of the statutes is renumbered 71.07 (9g) (d) 1.SB1074,522Section 5. 71.07 (9g) (d) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB1074,3,42371.07 (9g) (d) 2. If the allowable amount of the claim under par. (b) 3. exceeds 24the tax otherwise due under s. 71.02, the amount of the claim not used to offset the 1tax due shall be certified by the department of revenue to the department of 2administration for payment by check, share draft, or other draft drawn from the 3appropriation account under s. 20.835 (2) (cd). Notwithstanding s. 71.82, no 4interest shall be paid on amounts certified under this subdivision.SB1074,65Section 6. 71.10 (4) (cs) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1074,3,7671.10 (4) (cs) Additional child and dependent care tax credit under s. 71.07 7(9g) (b) 1. or 2.SB1074,78Section 7. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 9is amended to read:SB1074,3,191071.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 11preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 12beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 1371.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 1471.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., film production services credit under s. 71.07 (5f) (b) 2., veterans 15and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 71.07 (6e), enterprise zone jobs 16credit under s. 71.07 (3w), electronics and information technology manufacturing 17zone credit under s. 71.07 (3wm), earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), 18additional child and dependent care tax credit under s. 71.07 (9g) (b) 3., estimated 19tax payments under s. 71.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.SB1074,3,2020